Tennessee, session 114, SB1472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-1512(b)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(3) If the full tax due is paid, the city or county collecting official shall accept the
disputed portion of tax.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1472
009837
- 1 -